Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5719.01
Tier 6 weekly required compensation, defined.

Tier 6 weekly required compensation means two hundred percent of the county average weekly wage for the county in which the project is located or one hundred fifty percent of the state average weekly wage, whichever is higher. If the project is located in more than one county, the higher county average weekly wage shall be used to determine the tier 6 weekly required compensation.

Laws 2008, LB895, § 13.